Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-512
Buildings; entry and inspection; when authorized.

The State Fire Marshal, his or her first assistant, deputies, and subordinates, the chief of the fire department of each city or village where a fire department is established, the mayor of a city, the chairperson of the board of trustees of a village where no fire department exists, or the clerk of a township or the county commissioner of a commissioner district in territory without the limits of a city or village, at all reasonable hours, may enter into all buildings and upon all premises within his or her jurisdiction for the purposes of examination, in harmony with sections 81-501.01 to 81-531, the Nebraska Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1969, the Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act, and any other statutory duties imposed upon the State Fire Marshal.

Laws 1925, c. 183, § 11, p. 483;

C.S.1929, § 81-5511;

R.S.1943, § 81-512;

Laws 1993, LB 251, § 7.

Nebraska Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1969, see section 81-552.

Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act, see section 81-15,117.